src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NI_C_makizin_gt-norm.yaml
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Prt+Pl: gimakizinenyimibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Prt+4: gimakizinensimibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Prt+Loc: gimakizinensimibaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Prt+Pl: gimakizinensimibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Prt+4: omakizinenyimibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Prt+Loc: omakizinenyimibaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Prt+Pl: omakizinenyimibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Prt+4: omakizinensimibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Prt+Loc: omakizinensimibaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Prt+Pl: omakizinensimibaniin
     X+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Prt+4: imakizinenyimibaniin
     X+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Prt+Loc: imakizinenyimibaniing
     X+makizin+NI+Con+Pos+Prt+Pl: imakizinenyimibaniin
     X+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Prt+4: imakizinensimibaniin
     X+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Prt+Loc: imakizinensimibaniing
     X+makizin+NI+Dim+Pos+Prt+Pl: imakizinensimibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nimakizinenyishinaaniban
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nimakizinenyishinaanidig
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nimakizinensishinaaniban
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nimakizinensishinaanidig
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gimakizinenyishinaaniban
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimakizinenyishinaanidig
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: gimakizinenyishiwaaban
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimakizinenyishiwaadig
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gimakizinensishinaaniban
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimakizinensishinaanidig
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: gimakizinensishiwaaban
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimakizinensishiwaadig
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt: omakizinenyishiniiban
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: omakizinenyishiniidin
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: omakizinenyishiwaaban
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: omakizinenyishiwaadig
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt: omakizinensishiniiban
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: omakizinensishiniidin
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: omakizinensishiwaaban
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: omakizinensishiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+4: nimakizinenyishinaanin
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nimakizinenyishinaaning
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nimakizinenyishinaanig
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+4: nimakizinensishinaanin
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nimakizinensishinaaning
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nimakizinensishinaanig
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+4: gimakizinenyishinaanin
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gimakizinenyishinaaning
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gimakizinenyishinaanig
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+4: gimakizinenyishiwaan
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: gimakizinenyishiwaang
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: gimakizinenyishiwaag
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+4: gimakizinensishinaanin
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gimakizinensishinaaning
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gimakizinensishinaanig
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+4: gimakizinensishiwaan
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: gimakizinensishiwaang
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: gimakizinensishiwaag
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+4: omakizinenyishiniwa
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Loc: omakizinenyishiniing
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Pl: omakizinenyishiniwa
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+4: omakizinenyishiwaan
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: omakizinenyishiwaang
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: omakizinenyishiwaag
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+4: omakizinensishiniwa
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Loc: omakizinensishiniing
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Pl: omakizinensishiniwa
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+4: omakizinensishiwaan
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: omakizinensishiwaang
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: omakizinensishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: nimakizinenyishibaniin
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: nimakizinenyishibaniing
     1+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: nimakizinenyishibaniin
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: nimakizinensishibaniin
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: nimakizinensishibaniing
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: nimakizinensishibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: gimakizinenyishibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: gimakizinenyishibaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: gimakizinenyishibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: gimakizinensishibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: gimakizinensishibaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: gimakizinensishibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: omakizinenyishibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: omakizinenyishibaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: omakizinenyishibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: omakizinensishibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: omakizinensishibaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: omakizinensishibaniin
     X+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: imakizinenyishibaniin
     X+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: imakizinenyishibaniing
     X+makizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: imakizinenyishibaniin
     X+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: imakizinensishibaniin
     X+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: imakizinensishibaniing
     X+makizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: imakizinensishibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: nimakizinenyinaanibaniin
     1+makizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nimakizinenyinaanibaniing
     1+makizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nimakizinenyinaanibaniig
     1+makizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nimakizinenyinaanidigan
     1+makizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nimakizinenyinaanidiging
     1+makizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nimakizinenyinaanidigag
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: nimakizinensinaanibaniin
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nimakizinensinaanibaniing
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nimakizinensinaanibaniig
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nimakizinensinaanidigan
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nimakizinensinaanidiging
     1+makizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nimakizinensinaanidigag
     2+makizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: gimakizinenyinaanibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimakizinenyinaanibaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimakizinenyinaanibaniig
     2+makizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimakizinenyinaanidigan
     2+makizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimakizinenyinaanidiging
     2+makizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimakizinenyinaanidigag
     2+makizin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Prt+4: gimakizinenyiwaabaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimakizinenyiwaabaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimakizinenyiwaabaniig
     2+makizin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimakizinenyiwaadigan
     2+makizin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimakizinenyiwaadiging
     2+makizin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimakizinenyiwaadigag
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: gimakizinensinaanibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimakizinensinaanibaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimakizinensinaanibaniig
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimakizinensinaanidigan
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimakizinensinaanidiging
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimakizinensinaanidigag
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+4: gimakizinensiwaabaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimakizinensiwaabaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimakizinensiwaabaniig
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimakizinensiwaadigan
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimakizinensiwaadiging
     2+makizin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimakizinensiwaadigag
     3+makizin+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+4: omakizinenyiniibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+Loc: omakizinenyiniibaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+Pl: omakizinenyiniibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Con+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: omakizinenyiniidigan
     3+makizin+NI+Con+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: omakizinenyiniidiging
     3+makizin+NI+Con+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: omakizinenyiniidigan
     3+makizin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Prt+4: omakizinenyiwaabaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: omakizinenyiwaabaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: omakizinenyiwaabaniig
     3+makizin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: omakizinenyiwaadigan
     3+makizin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: omakizinenyiwaadiging
     3+makizin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: omakizinenyiwaadigag
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt+4: omakizinensiniibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt+Loc: omakizinensiniibaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt+Pl: omakizinensiniibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: omakizinensiniidigan
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: omakizinensiniidiging
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: omakizinensiniidigan
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+4: omakizinensiwaabaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: omakizinensiwaabaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: omakizinensiwaabaniig
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: omakizinensiwaadigan
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: omakizinensiwaadiging
     3+makizin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: omakizinensiwaadigag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nimakizinimishinaaniban
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nimakizinimishinaanidig
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gimakizinimishinaaniban
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimakizinimishinaanidig
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: gimakizinimishiwaaban
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimakizinimishiwaadig
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt: omakizinimishiniiban
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: omakizinimishiniidin
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: omakizinimishiwaaban
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: omakizinimishiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nimakizinimishinaanin
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nimakizinimishinaaning
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nimakizinimishinaanig
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gimakizinimishinaanin
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gimakizinimishinaaning
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gimakizinimishinaanig
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: gimakizinimishiwaan
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: gimakizinimishiwaang
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: gimakizinimishiwaag
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+4: omakizinimishiniwa
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Loc: omakizinimishiniing
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Pl: omakizinimishiniwa
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: omakizinimishiwaan
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: omakizinimishiwaang
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: omakizinimishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: nimakizinimishibaniin
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nimakizinimishibaniing
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nimakizinimishibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: gimakizinimishibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gimakizinimishibaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gimakizinimishibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: omakizinimishibaniin
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: omakizinimishibaniing
     3+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: omakizinimishibaniin
     X+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: imakizinimishibaniin
     X+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: imakizinimishibaniing
     X+makizin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: imakizinimishibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nimakiziniminaanibaniin
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nimakiziniminaanibaniing
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nimakiziniminaanibaniig
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nimakiziniminaanidigan
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nimakiziniminaanidiging
     1+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nimakiziniminaanidigag
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gimakiziniminaanibaniin
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimakiziniminaanibaniing
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimakiziniminaanibaniig
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimakiziniminaanidigan
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimakiziniminaanidiging
     2+makizin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimakiziniminaanidigag
